Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 8 Milk Gathering Stations

4-8-1.
Definitions.

The term “station” or “milk gathering station”, as used in this chapter, includes an established office where the business of buying milk or cream, as provided in this chapter, is carried on, with or without a place or premises in connection with the business for the physical handling of milk or cream.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-1

.

4-8-2.
License required — Application.

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall buy milk or cream in the state from producers for consumption or for manufacture in the state, unless that business is regularly transacted at an office or station in the state and unless that person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as provided in this chapter. Every person, firm, association, or corporation, before engaging or continuing in the business of buying milk or cream for the stated purposes, shall annually, on or before June 1st, file an application with the director of environmental management for a license to transact that business. The application shall state the nature of the business, the full name of the person or corporation applying for the license, and, if the applicant is a firm or association, the full name of each member of that firm, or association, the city or town and street number at which the business is to be conducted, and any other facts as the director prescribes. The applicant shall further satisfy the director of his, her, or its character, financial responsibility and good faith in seeking to carry on the business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 81, § 1.

4-8-3.
Issuance of license — Terms.

The director of environmental management shall issue to an applicant, on payment of twenty dollars ($20.00), a license entitling the applicant to conduct the business of buying milk and cream from producers for the stated purpose at an office or station at the place named in the application until the first day of July; provided, that if the application is presented in the month of May, and if the applicant elects, the license may be granted to begin on the first day of July and run for a term of one year. A license shall not be issued to any applicant if, during the year preceding the filing of the application, a complaint from any producer and seller of milk or cream has been filed with the director against that applicant for any of the grounds specified in §

4-8-14

, and that complaint has been established as true and just, to the satisfaction of the director, after the complaint has been investigated by him or her in the manner provided by §§

4-8-12

and

4-8-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 5.

4-8-4.
Proof of financial security.

A license shall not be issued as provided in §

4-8-3

unless the applicant for that license files with the application, a sworn financial statement in any form and giving any information that the director of environmental management may demand. The financial statement shall be made and executed under oath or written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury.

The director shall issue a license as provided in §

4-8-3

, only when the financial statement is deemed by the director to be adequate for the protection of the producers of milk selling to that dealer. If, in the judgment of the director, following examination and investigation of the financial statement, adequate financial security is not evident, the applicant shall be required before a license is issued, to furnish good and sufficient surety or sureties in any form and in any sums as the director deems necessary for the adequate protection of the producers selling to that dealer. Failure to furnish a financial statement or surety or sureties when demanded by the director shall be sufficient cause for refusal to grant a license or for the suspension or revocation of that license after the license has already been granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 3; P.L. 1930, ch. 1581, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-4

.

4-8-5.
Statements of defaulted claims against licensees.

Upon default by the licensee in the payment of any money due for the purchase of milk or cream, which payment is secured by the sworn financial statement or surety provided for, the creditor may file with the director of environmental management, upon a form prescribed by him or her, a verified statement of his or her claim. If the creditor has reduced the claim to judgment or shall before the commencement of the action by the director reduce the claim to judgment, a certified copy of the record of that judgment shall also be filed with the director. Statements may be filed at any time during the period of the license for purchases made during that period or within ninety (90) days from the termination of that period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-5

.

4-8-6.
Action to determine amounts due creditors of licensees.

After the expiration of ninety (90) days from the termination of any license period, the director of environmental management shall, by proper action where all the creditors and any surety given, as provided, and the licensee shall be parties, proceed to determine the amount due each creditor, and the judgment rendered in that action shall be enforced ratably for those creditors against the surety. If any creditor has reduced his or her claim to judgment, that judgment shall be presumptive proof of the amount due that creditor in any action brought by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-6

.

4-8-7.
Liability of sureties.

Every surety given in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be liable, in the first instance, for the payment of all claims arising during the license period for which the surety continues, and filed either during that period or within ninety (90) days after the expiration. If all claims shall be paid, the balance of the liability of each surety shall be devoted to the extinguishment ratably of claims arising during that license period, but for which statement shall not have been filed until ninety (90) days after the expiration of that period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-7

.

4-8-8.
Statement of disbursements — Additional bonds.

A person or corporation licensed under this chapter shall make a statement under oath of his, her, or its disbursements during a period to be prescribed by the director of environmental management, containing the names of the persons from whom products were purchased, the amount purchased and the amount due to the vendors. Those statements shall be submitted to the director, when requested by him or her, and shall be in the form prescribed by the director. If it appears from a statement or other facts ascertained by the director, upon inspection or investigation of the books and papers of the licensee, as authorized by §

4-8-12

, that the security afforded to persons selling milk and cream to that licensee by the bond executed by that licensee as provided does not adequately protect the vendors, the director may require that licensee to give an additional bond, to be executed in a sum determined by the director, but not exceeding by more than fifty percent (50%) the maximum amount paid out by that licensee to sellers of milk in any one month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-8

.

4-8-9.
Schedule of prices — Accounts of purchases.

Every proprietor of a milk gathering station shall post in a conspicuous place in his or her milk station, a schedule of the prices being paid for milk or cream, and shall keep a correct account of all the milk or cream daily received or purchased from each person at that milk station which account shall be open to inspection by any person selling or delivering milk or cream to that proprietor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-9

.

4-8-10.
Record of transactions — Periodical statements to sellers.

Every proprietor of a milk gathering station shall keep, in any form that the director of environmental management may prescribe, a record of transactions of purchases of milk or cream by him or her and he or she shall, at least semimonthly, or weekly if so agreed upon by the parties to the transaction, deliver to each person from whom he or she receives or purchases milk or cream, and in the unit of measure used in computing the amount due, an itemized statement of the several amounts or quantities of the milk or cream received or purchased at that milk station from that person during the prior half month or, if statements are delivered more frequently than semimonthly, during that period of time which has elapsed since the delivery of the last prior statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-10

.

4-8-11.
Applications for investigation.

If either party to the transaction of purchase and sale between a milk producer and a licensed buyer of milk is dissatisfied relative to any transaction of purchase and sale of milk between a milk producer and a licensed buyer of milk, he or she may apply to the director of environmental management, in writing, within thirty (30) days after the delivery of the milk to the licensed buyer, for investigation. The director shall treat the application as a complaint, and cause a full investigation of the transaction complained of to be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-11

.

4-8-12.
Investigative powers of director.

The director of environmental management has power to investigate upon the complaint of any interested person, or of his or her own motion, the record of any person, firm, or corporation applying for or holding a license, or any transaction involving the purchase of milk for shipment as provided for in this chapter; and for that purpose may examine the ledgers, books of account, memoranda, or other documents of any person, firm, association, or corporation applying for or holding a license and may take testimony under oath; but information relating to the general business of any that person, firm, association, or corporation, disclosed by this investigation and not relating to the immediate purpose shall be deemed of a confidential nature by the director and his or her assistants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-12

.

4-8-13.
Adjustments and hearings on complaints.

When a complaint is filed with the director of environmental management, he or she shall attempt to secure an explanation or adjustment, and, failing this within ten (10) days, he or she shall cause a copy of the complaint, together with a notice of the time and place for a hearing, to be served personally or by mail upon the applicant or licensee. If served by mail, the complaint and notice shall be directed to the applicant or licensee at his or her place of business, with postage fully prepaid. Service shall be made at least seven (7) days before the hearing. At the time and place appointed for the hearing, the director, or his or her representatives, shall hear the parties to the complaint, shall have power to administer oaths and shall enter in the records of the department of environmental management a decision either dismissing the complaint or specifying the facts which he or she deems established on the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-13

.

4-8-14.
Grounds for denial or revocation of license.

The director of environmental management may decline to grant a license or may revoke a license already granted when he or she is satisfied of the existence of the following cases or either of them:

Where a money judgment has been secured by any milk producer and has been entered against the applicant or licensee and remains unsatisfied of record.

Where there has been a failure to make prompt settlements to persons from whom the applicant buys milk, with intent to defraud.

Where there have been combinations to fix prices.

Where there has been a continual course of dealing of such nature as to satisfy the director of the inability of the applicant or licensee to properly conduct the business or of an intent to deceive or defraud customers.

Where there has been a continued and persistent failure to keep records, required by the director, in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-14

.

4-8-15.
Judicial review of decisions refusing or revoking licenses.

The action of the director in refusing to grant a license, or in revoking a license granted under this chapter shall be subject to review under the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-15

.

4-8-16.
Penalties for violations.

Any person who, being a buyer of milk for shipment for the purposes set forth in this chapter, whether that person be licensed or whether his or her business be transacted at a station or otherwise, fails to make prompt payments for milk purchased, with intent to defraud, or makes any false or misleading statement or statements enumerated in this chapter, with intent to deceive, or enters into any combination to fix prices, or not being licensed, conducts the business of buying milk for shipment as provided in this chapter, or being licensed or otherwise, engages in that business without having a station or office, or fails to conform to any requirement of or violates any of the provisions of this chapter, with intent to deceive a seller of milk, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall for the first offense be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both; and shall for the second offense be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days, or both; and shall for the third offense within any one calendar year be imprisoned for not more than ninety (90) days, and shall forfeit his or her license and be disqualified from obtaining a license within two (2) years after the forfeiture of license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-16

.

4-8-17.
Disposition of fines.

All moneys collected in fines or fees under the provisions of this chapter shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-17

.

4-8-18.
Employment of help by director — Expenses.

The director of environmental management may employ any help and incur any expense necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter within the amount appropriated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-18

.

4-8-19.
Other laws preserved — Producers exempt.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to repeal or alter or vary the provisions of chapter 5 of title 21, or to require the license provided for from any person whose principal business is the production of milk, or to require a license from a producer of milk who may deliver milk direct to any store or place, or who retails his or her product direct to the consumer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1656, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 204, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 218, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

4-8-19

.